Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation
247.962.
Annual report.

The corporation shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor and the General Assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating financial statement relating to the corporation during the year. The persons performing such audits shall furnish copies of the audit to the secretary, Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the executive director of the Office of Financial Management, where they shall be placed on file and made available for inspection by the general public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 12, effective April 11, 1984.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

247.964.
Personal liability of board or officers.

No member of the board of directors or other officer of the corporation shall be made subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of their execution of any obligations of the corporation nor the issuance thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 13, effective April 11, 1984.

247.966.
Expenditure of funds.

The corporation is authorized to accept and expend such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly or such moneys as may be received from any source, including income from the corporation’s operations, for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 14, effective April 11, 1984.

247.968.
Corporation exempt from taxation — Payment in lieu of taxes.

The corporation shall not be required to pay any taxes and assessments to the Commonwealth or any county, municipality or other governmental subdivision of the Commonwealth upon any of its property or upon its obligations or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, or upon any moneys, funds, revenues or other income held or received by the corporation and the bonds or notes of the corporation and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation, except for death and gift taxes and taxes of transfers; provided, however, that real or personal property owned by the corporation shall be exempt from all property taxation and special assessments of the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions, but the corporation shall pay, in lieu of such taxes, such amounts as would have been levied had not said real or personal property been owned by the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 15, effective April 11, 1984.

247.970.
Powers supplemental to those held by other governmental agencies.

To the extent the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

delegate to the corporation powers concurrently now held by other governmental agencies, including, but not being limited to, the provisions of KRS

103.200

to

103.285

and KRS

154.20-035

to

154.20-140

, the provisions hereof shall be regarded as supplemental and not in derogation of any powers now existing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 16, effective April 11, 1984.

247.972.
Termination or dissolution of corporation.

Upon the termination or dissolution of the corporation, all rights and properties of the corporation shall pass to and be vested in the Commonwealth, subject to the rights of lienholders and other creditors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 17, effective April 11, 1984.

247.974.
Banks may apply for loans for qualified farmers.

All state and federally chartered banks may apply through the corporation for loans for qualified farmers and such banks shall receive a commission therefor as determined by the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 18, effective April 11, 1984.

247.976.
Expenses.

All expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

shall be paid from revenue bonds or notes issued by the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 19, effective April 11, 1984.

247.978.
Debt limitation for qualified applicant.

The total amount of principal which a qualified applicant may owe to the corporation at any one (1) time shall not exceed:

Two-hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for first time farmers as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture, Farm Service Agency; or

One million dollars ($1,000,000) for other applicants.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 20, effective April 11, 1984; 1990, ch. 440, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 2004, ch. 41, § 6, effective July 13, 2004.